District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.30

Special signs for failure to yield to pedestrians in crosswalks.

The District Department of Transportation shall develop and implement a plan to create and post special signs with the following or substantially similar notation: “D.C. Law: Failure to stop for pedestrians in crosswalk punishable by $250 fine”. The signs shall be posted at selected District crosswalks and intersections to alert motorists of the fine for this infraction. The Director of the District Department of Transportation shall be responsible for determining which crosswalks and intersections shall have the signs.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-269, § 4, 55 DCR 11015
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 141, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “pedestrians in crosswalks” for “a pedestrian” in the section heading.